Hawaii, session 2026, HB2173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that it is of critical importance to the State to ensure its residents have prompt access to primary health care.  The legislature further finds that in the county of Maui, ambulance services are being provided through a private contract with American Medical Response with state funding, and that a total of nine ambulances are based at various state, county, and private facilities throughout the county - specifically, one unit each in east Maui, Kahului, and Wailuku, and two units each in south Maui, west Maui, and upcountry Maui. The legislature also finds that there has been significant population growth in central Maui, and therefore, residents in the area would greatly benefit from the addition of an advanced life support ambulance.  The legislature further finds that an advanced life support ambulance will help reduce death and disability among residents and visitors to central Maui by providing timely responses to 911 calls, which is critical to increasing the likelihood of successful outcomes for injured or sick individuals. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to: (1)  Purchase one advanced life support ambulance and related equipment to be based in the central Maui area of the county of Maui and fund pay-related personnel costs for state-certified emergency medical services personnel; and (2)  Increase the predictability and stability of available air ambulance services for all islands in the State. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purchase of one advanced life support ambulance and related equipment to be based in the central Maui area of the county of Maui, and to fund pay-related personnel costs for one state-certified emergency medical technician and one state-certified paramedic. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to increase the predictability and stability of available air ambulance services for all islands in the State. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________